Utah statutes.
4-37-301.   Certificate of registration required to operate a fee fishing facility.

(1)  A person may not operate a fee fishing facility without first obtaining a certificate of registration from the department.

(2) (a)  Each application for a certificate of registration to operate a fee fishing facility shall be accompanied by a fee.

(b)  The fee shall be established by the department in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  The department shall coordinate with the Division of Wildlife Resources:

(a)  on the suitability of the proposed site relative to potential impacts on adjacent aquatic wildlife populations; and

(b)  in determining which species the holder of the certificate of registration may possess or transport to or stock into the facility.

(4)  The department shall list on the certificate of registration the species which the holder may possess or transport to or stock into the facility.

(5)  A person holding a certificate of registration for an aquaculture facility may also operate a fee fishing facility without obtaining an additional certificate of registration, if the fee fishing facility:

(a)  is in a body of water meeting the criteria of Section 4-37-111 which is connected with the aquaculture facility;

(b)  contains only those aquatic animals specified on the certificate of registration for the aquaculture facility; and

(c)  is designated on the certificate of registration for the aquaculture facility.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

